Illinois, session 104th, SB2355.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Officials and Employees Ethics Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-70 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 430/5-70 new)7    Sec. 5-70. Private pay for public work; prohibited. No 8State employee may receive monetary or other compensation from 9any private party for work performed within the scope of his or 10her employment by a State agency. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.